Ohio, session 136, HB738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.155 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.155. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, that portion of interstate route number two hundred seventy, running in an easterly and westerly direction, between mile marker forty-eight and mile marker fifty-two, within Franklin county, shall be known as the "PFC Chris Dixon Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.